Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-4,112
Rules and regulations; filed; distributed; inmates to be informed of rules and policies.

(1) Copies of all rules and regulations shall be filed pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act and shall be distributed to all adult correctional facilities in this state.

(2) Inmates shall be informed of rules and policies concerning behavior and discipline, inmate rights and developmental opportunities, work or education programs, and complaint procedures at the facility. Such rules and policies, or significant portions thereof, shall be posted at conspicuous places throughout the facility.

Laws 1976, LB 275, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 54.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.